Illinois, session 104th, HB5065.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 222 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/222)7    Sec. 222. Live theater production credit. 8    (a) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2012 and 9beginning prior to January 1, 2039, January 1, 2027, a 10taxpayer who has received a tax credit award under the Live 11Theater Production Tax Credit Act for a long-run production, a 12pre-Broadway production, or a commercial Broadway touring show 13is entitled to a credit against the taxes imposed under 14subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act in an amount 15determined under that Act by the Department of Commerce and 16Economic Opportunity.17    (b) For taxable years ending before December 31, 2023, if 18the taxpayer is a partnership, limited liability partnership, 19limited liability company, or Subchapter S corporation, the 20tax credit award is allowed to the partners, unit holders, or 21shareholders in accordance with the determination of income 22and distributive share of income under Sections 702 and 704 23and Subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. For taxable   HB5065- 2 -LRB104 17455 HLH 33845 b1years ending on or after December 31, 2023, if the taxpayer is 2a partnership or Subchapter S corporation, then the provisions 3of Section 251 apply.4    (c) A sale, assignment, or transfer of the tax credit 5award may be made by the taxpayer earning the credit within one 6year after the credit is awarded in accordance with rules 7adopted by the Department of Commerce and Economic 8Opportunity. 9    (d) The Department of Revenue, in cooperation with the 10Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity, shall adopt 11rules to enforce and administer the provisions of this 12Section. 13    (e) The tax credit award may not be carried back. If the 14amount of the credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, 15the excess may be carried forward and applied to the tax 16liability of the 5 tax years following the excess credit year. 17The tax credit award shall be applied to the earliest year for 18which there is a tax liability. If there are credits from more 19than one tax year that are available to offset liability, the 20earlier credit shall be applied first. In no event may a credit 21under this Section reduce the taxpayer's liability to less 22than zero. 23(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 103-396, eff. 1-1-24; 24103-592, eff. 6-7-24.) 25    Section 10. The Live Theater Production Tax Credit Act is   HB5065- 3 -LRB104 17455 HLH 33845 b1amended by changing Sections 10-10 and 10-20 as follows: 2    (35 ILCS 17/10-10)3    Sec. 10-10. Definitions. As used in this Act:4    "Accredited theater production" means a for-profit live 5stage presentation in a qualified production facility, as 6defined in this Section, that is either (i) a pre-Broadway 7production or (ii) a long-run production for which the 8aggregate Illinois labor and marketing expenditures exceed 9$100,000. For credits awarded under this Act on or after July 101, 2022, "accredited theater production" also includes any 11commercial Broadway touring show. For credits awarded under 12this Act on or after July 1, 2024, "accredited theater 13production" also includes non-profit theater productions. 14    "Commercial Broadway touring show" means a production that 15(i) is performed in a qualified production facility and plays 16in more than 2 other markets in North America outside of 17Illinois within 12 months of its Illinois presentation and 18(ii) has Illinois production spending of not less than 19$100,000, as shown on the applicant's application for the 20credit. 21    "Pre-Broadway production" means a live stage production 22that, (i) in its original or adaptive version, is performed in 23a qualified production facility and has with the goal of 24having a presentation scheduled for Broadway's Theater 25District in New York City no later than 18 months after its   HB5065- 4 -LRB104 17455 HLH 33845 b1Illinois presentation and (ii) has Illinois production 2spending of not less than $100,000, as shown on the 3applicant's application for the credit.4    "Long-run production" means a live stage production that 5is performed in a qualified production facility for longer 6than 8 weeks, with at least 6 performances per week, and 7includes a production that spans the end of one tax year and 8the commencement of a new tax year that, in combination, meets 9the criteria set forth in this definition making it a long-run 10production eligible for a theater tax credit award in each tax 11year or portion thereof.12    "Non-profit theater production" means a live stage 13production that is at least 75 minutes in length with a written 14script that (i) is produced by a 501(c)3 non-profit registered 15in the State of Illinois for at least 5 years, (ii) has 16Illinois production spending of not less than $10,000, as 17shown on the applicant's application for the credit, and (iii) 18has a minimum annual operating budget of $25,000 or more, as 19shown on the applicant's application for the credit. 20    "Accredited theater production certificate" means a 21certificate issued by the Department certifying that the 22production is an accredited theater production that meets the 23guidelines of this Act.24    "Applicant" means a theater producer, owner, licensee, 25operator, or presenter that is presenting or has presented a 26live stage presentation located within the State of Illinois   HB5065- 5 -LRB104 17455 HLH 33845 b1who:2        (1) owns or licenses the theatrical rights of the 3    stage presentation for the Illinois production period; or4        (2) has contracted or will contract directly with the 5    owner or licensee of the theatrical rights or a person 6    acting on behalf of the owner or licensee to provide live 7    performances of the production.8    An applicant that directly or indirectly owns, controls, 9or operates multiple qualified production facilities shall be 10presumed to be and considered for the purposes of this Act to 11be a single applicant; provided, however, that as to each of 12the applicant's qualified production facilities, the applicant 13shall be eligible to separately and contemporaneously (i) 14apply for and obtain accredited theater production 15certificates, (ii) stage accredited theater productions, and 16(iii) apply for and receive a tax credit award certificate for 17each of the applicant's accredited theater productions 18performed at each of the applicant's qualified production 19facilities.20    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 21Opportunity.22    "Director" means the Director of the Department.23    "Illinois labor expenditure" means gross salary or wages 24including, but not limited to, taxes, benefits, and any other 25consideration incurred or paid to non-talent employees of the 26applicant for services rendered to and on behalf of the   HB5065- 6 -LRB104 17455 HLH 33845 b1accredited theater production. To qualify as an Illinois labor 2expenditure, the expenditure must be:3        (1) incurred or paid by the applicant on or after the 4    effective date of the Act for services related to any 5    portion of an accredited theater production from its 6    pre-production stages, including, but not limited to, the 7    writing of the script, casting, hiring of service 8    providers, purchases from vendors, marketing, advertising, 9    public relations, load in, rehearsals, performances, other 10    accredited theater production related activities, and load 11    out;12        (2) directly attributable to the accredited theater 13    production;14        (3) limited to the first $100,000 of wages incurred or 15    paid to each employee of an accredited theater production 16    in each tax year;17        (4) included in the federal income tax basis of the 18    property;19        (5) paid in the tax year for which the applicant is 20    claiming the tax credit award, or no later than 60 days 21    after the end of the tax year;22        (6) paid to persons residing in Illinois at the time 23    payments were made; and24        (7) reasonable in the circumstances.25    "Illinois production spending" means any and all expenses 26directly or indirectly incurred relating to an accredited   HB5065- 7 -LRB104 17455 HLH 33845 b1theater production presented in any qualified production 2facility of the applicant, including, but not limited to, 3expenditures for:4        (1) national marketing, public relations, and the 5    creation and placement of print, electronic, television, 6    billboard, and other forms of advertising; and7        (2) the construction and fabrication of scenic 8    materials and elements; provided, however, that the 9    maximum amount of expenditures attributable to the 10    construction and fabrication of scenic materials and 11    elements eligible for a tax credit award shall not exceed 12    $500,000 per applicant per production in any single tax 13    year.14    "Qualified production facility" means a facility located 15in the State in which live theatrical productions are, or are 16intended to be, exclusively presented that contains at least 17one stage, a seating capacity of 1,200 or more seats or, if the 18live theater production is a non-profit theater production, a 19seating capacity of 50 or more seats, and dressing rooms, 20storage areas, and other ancillary amenities necessary for the 21accredited theater production.22    "Tax credit award" means the issuance to a taxpayer by the 23Department of a tax credit award in conformance with Sections 2410-40 and 10-45 of this Act.25    "Tax year" means a calendar year for the period January 1 26to and including December 31.  HB5065- 8 -LRB104 17455 HLH 33845 b1(Source: P.A. 102-1112, eff. 12-21-22; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24.) 2    (35 ILCS 17/10-20)3    Sec. 10-20. Tax credit award. Subject to the conditions 4set forth in this Act, an applicant is entitled to a tax credit 5award as approved by the Department for qualifying Illinois 6labor expenditures and Illinois production spending for each 7tax year in which the applicant is awarded an accredited 8theater production certificate issued by the Department. The 9amount of tax credits awarded pursuant to this Act shall not 10exceed $2,000,000 in any State fiscal year ending on or before 11June 30, 2022. The amount of tax credits awarded pursuant to 12this Act for the State fiscal year ending on June 30, 2023 or 13the State fiscal year ending on June 30, 2024 shall not exceed 14$4,000,000. For the State fiscal year ending on June 30, 2023 15and the State fiscal year ending on June 30, 2024, no more than 16$2,000,000 in credits may be awarded in either of those fiscal 17years to accredited theater productions that are not 18commercial Broadway touring shows, and no more than $2,000,000 19in credits may be awarded in either of those fiscal years to 20commercial Broadway touring shows. For State fiscal years 21ending on or after June 30, 2025, the amount of tax credits 22awarded under this Act shall not exceed $6,000,000, with no 23more than $2,000,000 in credits awarded for long-run 24productions and pre-Broadway productions, no more than 25$2,000,000 in credits awarded for commercial Broadway touring   HB5065- 9 -LRB104 17455 HLH 33845 b1shows, and no more than $2,000,000 in credits awarded for 2non-profit theater productions. If, in any State fiscal year, 3less than $2,000,000 in credits under this Act are awarded for 4long-run productions and pre-Broadway productions, then the 5difference between $2,000,000 and the amount of credits 6awarded for long-run productions and pre-Broadway productions 7in that fiscal year may be added to the $2,000,000 in credits 8allowed to be awarded for commercial Broadway touring shows in 9that State fiscal year. 10    The $2,000,000 in credits that may be awarded for 11non-profit theater productions under this Act in a State 12fiscal year shall be allocated as follows: 13        (1) no credits may be awarded for non-profit theater 14    productions that have an annual operating budget of less 15    than $25,000; 16        (2) no more than $225,000 in credits may be awarded, 17    in the aggregate, for non-profit theater productions that 18    have an annual operating budget of $25,000 or more but 19    less than $250,000; 20        (3) no more than $225,000 in credits may be awarded, 21    in the aggregate, for non-profit theater productions that 22    have an annual operating budget of $250,000 or more but 23    less than $1,000,000; 24        (4) no more than $250,000 in credits may be awarded, 25    in the aggregate, for non-profit theater productions that 26    have an annual operating budget of $1,000,000 or more but   HB5065- 10 -LRB104 17455 HLH 33845 b1    less than $2,500,000; 2        (5) no more than $300,000 in credits may be awarded, 3    in the aggregate, for non-profit theater productions that 4    have an annual operating budget of $2,500,000 or more but 5    less than $5,000,000; 6        (6) no more than $300,000 in credits may be awarded, 7    in the aggregate, for non-profit theater productions that 8    have an annual operating budget of $5,000,000 or more but 9    less than $10,000,000; and 10        (7) no more than $700,000 in credits may be awarded, 11    in the aggregate, for non-profit theater productions that 12    have an annual operating budget of $10,000,000 or more. 13    Credits shall be awarded on a first-come, first-served 14basis. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the amount of credits 15applied for in any fiscal year exceeds the amount authorized 16to be awarded under this Section, the excess credit amount 17shall be awarded in the next fiscal year in which credits 18remain available for award and shall be treated as having been 19applied for on the first day of that fiscal year. 20(Source: P.A. 102-700, eff. 4-19-22; 102-1112, eff. 12-21-22; 21103-592, eff. 6-7-24; 103-1055, eff. 12-20-24.) 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 23becoming law.